Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2951
Vaccine; sale and use restrictions.

(1) The State Veterinarian may restrict the sale and use of vaccine as he or she deems appropriate.

(2) The sale and use of vaccines which are licensed and approved by the United States Department of Agriculture, Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service, Center for Veterinary Biologics, shall be used for the vaccination of livestock and such vaccines shall be distributed and administered by an accredited veterinarian licensed to practice in Nebraska.

(3) An affected animal, herd, or flock shall only be vaccinated by or under approval by an accredited veterinarian licensed to practice in Nebraska.

(4) Owners or custodians of animals, herds, or flocks not affected due to anthrax may purchase anthrax vaccine from an accredited veterinarian licensed to practice in Nebraska for purposes of treating such animals.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 51.